Utah statutes.
10-2-101.   Definitions.
(1)  As used in this part:
(a)  "Commission" means a boundary commission established under Section
10-2-409 for the county in which the property that is proposed to be
incorporated is located.
(b)  "Feasibility consultant" means a person or firm with expertise in the
processes and economics of local government.
(c)  "Private," with respect to real property, means not owned by the United
States or any agency of the federal government, the state, a county, a
municipality, a school district, a local district under Title 17B, Limited
Purpose Local Government Entities - Local Districts, a special service
district under Title 17D, Chapter 1, Special Service District Act, or any
other political subdivision or governmental entity of the state.
(2)  For purposes of this part:
(a)  the owner of real property shall be the record title owner according to
the records of the county recorder on the date of the filing of the request or
petition; and
(b)  the value of private real property shall be determined according to the
last assessment roll for county taxes before the filing of the request or
petition.
(3)  For purposes of each provision of this part that requires the owners of
private real property covering a percentage or fraction of the total private
land area within an area to sign a request or petition:
(a)  a parcel of real property may not be included in the calculation of the
required percentage or fraction unless the request or petition is signed by:
(i)  except as provided in Subsection (3)(a)(ii), owners representing a
majority ownership interest in that parcel; or
(ii)  if the parcel is owned by joint tenants or tenants by the entirety, 50%
of the number of owners of that parcel;
(b)  the signature of a person signing a request or petition in a
representative capacity on behalf of an owner is invalid unless:
(i)  the person's representative capacity and the name of the owner the person
represents are indicated on the request or petition with the person's
signature; and
(ii)  the person provides documentation accompanying the request or petition
that substantiates the person's representative capacity; and
(c)  subject to Subsection (3)(b), a duly appointed personal representative
may sign a request or petition on behalf of a deceased owner.
